Louisiana, session 2026, SB393.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1472.2(4), (9.1), and (18), 1472.3(E)(3)(b), and 1472.9(A) are
hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 40:1472.2(7.1) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1472.2. Definitions
The following words used in this Part shall have the meanings respectively
ascribed to them in this Section, including singular as follows:
* * *
(4) "Blaster" shall mean a person employed by a primary licensee who
detonates or otherwise effects the explosion of an explosive or a person employed
by a primary licensee who is in immediate personal charge and supervision of one
or more other persons engaged in such activity directly manages, supervises, or
directs the activities of one or more persons employed by the same licensee who
detonates or otherwise effects the explosion of an explosive by intentionally
causing an explosion of an explosive to occur.
* * *
(7.1) "Explosives business" shall mean any corporation, company,
association, firm, partnership, society, or joint stock company which engages in
the manufacturing, distributing, buying, selling, or consumption of explosives
and explosives materials.
* * *
(9.1) "Handler" shall mean a person who touches, moves, or otherwise
handles transports explosives but does not detonate or otherwise nor effect the
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 393 ENROLLED
explosion of explosives or explosives materials by intentionally causing an
explosion of an explosive to occur. The license issued to a handler shall not be used
by a blaster or user who uses explosives as an ultimate consumer the final end
consumer of the explosive.
* * *
(18) "Person" means any individual, or employee or member of a
corporation, company, association, firm, partnership, society, or joint stock company
that acquires, sells, possesses, stores, engages in the use of, or transports
explosives in this state.
* * *
§1472.3. License; manufacturer, dealer-distributor, user, blaster, or handler of
explosives
* * *
E. * * *
(3) * * *
(b) The department shall execute a thorough background investigation,
including a criminal history records check, of every applicant for the purpose of
verifying or renewing the qualifications of the applicant for explosives licensing
pursuant to the requirements of this Section. For purposes of this Subparagraph, a
background check shall be defined as a fingerprint-based check of all state and
national records of arrest, prosecution, or conviction. and all State records of arrest
shall include expunged information and dismissed convictions pursuant to Code of
Criminal Procedure Articles 893 and 894, as well as national records which shall
include fingerprints of the applicant and other identifying information, that shall be
requested by the department. The department shall require any current or licensee
for an explosives license renewal or an applicant for a new explosives license as
a prospective manufacturer, dealer-distributor, user, blaster, or handler of explosives
as defined in R.S. 40:1472.2 to submit to a criminal history records check to be
conducted by the Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information.
Fingerprints and other identifying information from the current or shall be obtained
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 393 ENROLLED
from an applicant as a prospective manufacturer, dealer-distributor, user, blaster,
or handler of explosives and shall be submitted to the bureau to initiate the
criminal history records search. In addition, when the department requests a
national criminal history records check, the The bureau shall simultaneously
forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal
history records check and shall provide the department with the national criminal
history record information of the current or licensee or the applicant of a new
explosives license as a prospective manufacturer, dealer-distributor, user, blaster,
or handler.
* * *
§1472.9. Civil penalties
A. After notice and an opportunity for a hearing held in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, the deputy secretary may assess a civil penalty not to
exceed ten thousand dollars for each violation against any person or explosives
business he determines to have violated any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to
this Part. In determining the amount of the penalty the deputy secretary shall take
into account the nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of the violation, the
degree of culpability of the person or explosives business violating the rule or
regulation, the person's or explosives business's history of previous offenses, the
person's or explosives business's ability to pay and the effect of the penalty on his
ability to continue to operate, and any other matter that justice requires.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.